Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2485
Agencies; other laws applicable.

Insofar as any provisions of sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 are applicable to the formation, organization, or operation of power projects, generators, or suppliers of electric energy, all agencies created pursuant to sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 70, articles 10 and 13.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 85.